South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S328.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-81-40(D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (D)(1) A resident may be transferred or discharged only for medical reasons, for the welfare of the resident or for the welfare of other residents of the facility, or for nonpayment and must be given written notice of not less than thirty days, except that when the health, safety, or welfare of other residents of the facility would be endangered by the thirty-day notice requirement, the time for giving notice must be that which is practicable under the circumstances. Each resident must be given written notice before the resident's room or roommate in the facility is changed. (2) Prior to permanent closure of a long-term care facility, residents must be given written notice of not less than ninety days of the effective closure date in order to facilitate the transfer or discharge of residents. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----